test/src/gt-desc-yamls/nounDES_gt-desc.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Nouns with Sub forms. Loan word lexicons with Err/Orth forms and some single words with Err/Orth, Err/Lex and and Err/Der tags

Tests:

# Loan word lexicons with sub forms

  Noun - bállemmasjijnna: # MASKIN
    bállemmasjijnna+N+Sg+Nom: [bállemmasjijnna, bállemmásjijnna]
    bállemmasjijnna+N+Sg+Ill: [bállemmasjijnnaj, bállemmásjijnnaj]
    bállemmasjijnna+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [bállemmasjijnasj, bállemmásjijnasj]

  Noun - resymedja: # KAFÉ
    resymedja+N+Sg+Nom: [resymedja, resymiedja, resyméa, resymea]
    resymedja+N+Sg+Ela: [resymejas, resymiejas, resyméas, resymeas]
    
  Noun - sosiolåvggå: # DEMAGOG
    sosiolåvggå+N+Sg+Nom: [sosiolåvggå, sociolåvggå, sosiologa, sociologa]
    sosiolåvggå+N+Sg+Ela: [sosiolåvgås, sociolåvgås, sosiologas, sociologas]

  Noun - stenografiddja: # ALLEGORI
    stenografiddja+N+Sg+Nom: [stenografiddja, stenografijja, stenografija]
    stenografiddja+N+Sg+Ela: [stenografidjas, stenografijjas, stenografijas]
  
  Noun - videotæhkka: # APOTEK
    videotæhkka+N+Sg+Nom: [videotæhkka, videotähkka, videotiehkka, videotehkka]
    videotæhkka+N+Sg+Ela: [videotehkas, videotiehkas, videotehkas]
    
  Noun - fabrihkka: # ANTIKK
    fabrihkka+N+Sg+Nom: [fabrihkka,fábrihkka,fabrijkka,fábrijkka]
    fabrihkka+N+Sg+Ine: [fabrihkan,fábrihkan,fabrijkan,fábrijkan]
    fabrihkka+N+Sg+Ill: [fabrihkkaj,fábrihkkaj,fabrijkkaj,fábrijkkaj]
  
  Noun - kolesteråvllå: # ALKOHOL
    kolesteråvllå+N+Sg+Nom: [kolesteråvllå, kolesterola]
    kolesteråvllå+N+Sg+Ela: [kolesteråvlås, kolesterolas]
   
  Noun - kromosåvmmå: # AGRONOM
    kromosåvmmå+N+Sg+Nom: [kromosåvmmå, kromosoma] 
    kromosåvmmå+N+Sg+Ela: [kromosåvmås, kromosomas]
    
  Noun - metyliedna: # HYDROGEN
    metyliedna+N+Sg+Nom: [metyliedna, metyledna, metylena]
    metyliedna+N+Sg+Ela: [metylienas, metylenas, metylenas]
    
  Noun - observaterra: # INSPEKTØR
    observaterra+N+Sg+Nom: [observaterra, observatørra]
    observaterra+N+Sg+Ela: [observateras, observatøras]
  
  Noun - originalitæhtta: # ALFABET
    originalitæhtta+N+Sg+Nom: [originalitæhtta, originalitähtta, originalitiehtta, originalitehtta]
    originalitæhtta+N+Sg+Ela: [originalitehtas, originalitiehtas, originalitehtas]
  
  Noun - ornamænnta: # PATENT
    ornamænnta+N+Sg+Nom: [ornamænnta, ornamännta, ornamennta]
    ornamænnta+N+Sg+Ela: [ornamentas, ornamentas]
  
  Noun - semænnta: # PATENT
    semænnta+N+Sg+Nom: [semænnta, semännta, cemænnta, cemännta, cemennta, semennta]
    semænnta+N+Sg+Ine: [sementan, cementan]
    semænnta+N+Sg+Ill: [semænntaj, semänntaj, cemænntaj, semenntaj, cemenntaj, cemänntaj]
    semænnta+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [sementasj, cementasj]
  
  Noun - diminutijvva: # ADJEKTIV
    diminutijvva+N+Sg+Nom: [diminutijvva,deminutijvva]
    diminutijvva+N+Sg+Ine: [diminutijvan,deminutijvan]
    diminutijvva+N+Sg+Ill: [diminutijvvaj,deminutijvvaj]
    diminutijvva+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [diminutijvasj,deminutijvasj]

# single words with sub forms

  Noun - dåbddomærkka: # MUORRA, Err/Orth
    dåbddomærkka+N+Sg+Nom: [dåbddomærkka, dåbddomärkka,dåbddåmærkka, dåbddåmärkka]
    dåbddomærkka+N+Sg+Ine: [dåbddomerkan,dåbddåmerkan]
    dåbddomærkka+N+Sg+Ill: [dåbddomærkkaj, dåbddomärkkaj,dåbddåmærkkaj, dåbddåmärkkaj]
    dåbddomærkka+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [dåbddomerkasj,dåbddåmerkasj]

  Noun - lihtar: # SÅHKÅR, ÅRES, Err/Orth
    lihtar+N+Sg+Nom: [lihtar, lijtar, lijter, lihter]
    lihtar+N+Pl+Nom: [lihttara, lijttára, lijttara, lihttára]
    lihtar+N+Sg+Ill: [lihttarij, lijttarij, lijttárij, lihttárij]

  Noun - rássjosuoján: # GAHPER, Err/Orth
    rássjosuoján+N+Sg+Nom: [rássjosuoján,rássjosuojun]
    rássjosuoján+N+Sg+Ine: [rássjosuojánin,rássjosuojunin]
    rássjosuoján+N+Sg+Ill: [rássjosuojánij,rássjosuojunij]
  
  Noun - byddja: # NOADE, Err/Lex
    byddja+N+Sg+Nom: byddja
    byddja+N+Sg+Ine: byddjan
    byddja+N+Sg+Ill: byddjaj
  
  Noun - interviermme: # MUORRA_LOAN, Err/Lex
    interviermme+N+Sg+Nom: interviermme
    interviermme+N+Sg+Ine: interviermen
    interviermme+N+Sg+Ill: [interværmmáj, intervärmmáj]
  
  Noun - elmihttár: # GAHPER, Err/Der
    elmihttár+N+Sg+Nom: elmihttár
    elmihttár+N+Sg+Ine: elmihttárin
    elmihttár+N+Sg+Ill: elmihttárij
  
  Noun - gieddetjuohppe: # ACTOR, Err/Der
    gieddetjuohppe+N+Sg+Nom: gieddetjuohppe
    gieddetjuohppe+N+Sg+Ine: gieddetjuohppen
    gieddetjuohppe+N+Sg+Ill: gieddetjuohppáj
    
  Noun - nuorttaviesun: # ACTOR, Err/Der
    nuorttaviesun+N+Sg+Nom: nuorttaviesun
    nuorttaviesun+N+Sg+Ine: nuorttaviesunin
    nuorttaviesun+N+Sg+Ill: nuorttaviesunij
    
  Noun - sebrulasj: # BERULASJ, -dtj- stem sub tagged
    sebrulasj+N+Sg+Nom: sebrulasj 
    sebrulasj+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [sebrulattjam, sebruladtjam]
    sebrulasj+N+Sg+Gen: sebrulattja
    sebrulasj+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: sebrulattjama
    sebrulasj+N+Sg+Acc: sebrulattjav
    sebrulasj+N+Sg+Ine: sebrulattjan 
    sebrulasj+N+Sg+Ill: [sebrulattjaj, sebruladtjaj]
    sebrulasj+N+Sg+Ela: sebrulattjas
    sebrulasj+N+Sg+Com: [sebrulattjajn, sebrulattjajna]
    sebrulasj+N+Pl+Nom: sebrulattja
    sebrulasj+N+Pl+Gen: sebrulattjaj
    sebrulasj+N+Pl+Acc: sebrulattjajt
    sebrulasj+N+Pl+Ine: sebrulattjajn
    sebrulasj+N+Pl+Ill: sebrulattjajda
    sebrulasj+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: sebrulattjajdiseda
    sebrulasj+N+Pl+Ela: sebrulattjajs
    sebrulasj+N+Pl+Com: sebrulattjaj
    sebrulasj+N+Ess: [sebrulattjan, sebruladtjan]
    sebrulasj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: sebrulattjasj
    sebrulasj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: sebrulattjatjasj
    sebrulasj+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    sebrulasj+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    sebrulasj+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    sebrulasj+N+Abe: [sebrulattjada, sebrulattjadak]
 
